District of Columbia statutes.
5-1501.08

Transfer of personnel, records, functions, and authority.

(a)

The Mayor shall provide for the orderly transfer to the Department all of the authority, responsibilities, duties, assets, and functions of MPD pertaining to forensic science services, including:

(1)

Forensic alcohol;

(2)

Computer forensics;

(3)

Analysis of controlled substances;

(4)

DNA/biological material analysis;

(5)

Fingerprint comparison;

(6)

Firearms and tool mark examination;

(7)

Forensic photography;

(8)

Analysis of questioned documents;

(9)

Trace evidence analysis;

(10)

Personnel and authority for vacant and filled positions;

(11)

Property;

(12)

Records; and

(13)

All unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the MPD for the purposes of forensic science services.

(a-1)

The Mayor shall provide for the orderly transfer to the Department all of the authority, responsibilities, duties, assets, and functions of the Department of Health pertaining to public health laboratory services, including:

(1)

Disease prevention, control and surveillance testing;

(2)

Emergency preparedness testing;

(3)

Food surveillance and testing;

(4)

Reference and specialized testing;

(5)

Integrated data management;

(6)

Education, training and partnerships;

(7)

Special research; and

(8)

The ability to seek grants pertaining to public health laboratory services from government agencies, including the Center for Disease Control.

(b)

The transfers set forth in subsections (a) and (a-1) of this section shall occur no later than October 1, 2012.

History

Aug. 17, 2011, D.C. Law 19-18, § 9, 58 DCR 5403
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 303, 59 DCR 12957

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-1501.07.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-266 added (a-1); and substituted “transfers set forth in subsections (a) and (a-1)” for “transfer set forth in subsection (a)” in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 303 of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary addition of (a-1) and amendment of (b), see § 303 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 13325).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).